West Virginia, session 2025, HB2417.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 1. DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL PROTECTION. §22-1-4. Disclosure of purpose for permitted activity. The Legislature finds that when an industrial, manufacturing, or other activity necessitates a permit pursuant to this chapter, that the public and residents in the proximity of that activity have a right to know the nature and purpose of the permitted activity, and that the entity applying for a permit shall disclose the lawful purpose of the activity with sufficient specificity to put the public on notice of the proposed activities that will occur at the permit location. The Director of the Department of Environmental Protection shall require, for a permit pursuant to this provisions of this chapter, disclosure of this information as part of the permit application: Provided, That the provisions of this section may not require disclosure of trade secrets or other propriety information by the applicant.